Utah statutes.
77-30-24.   Payment of expenses -- Extradition costs.
(1)  When the punishment of the crime is the confinement of the defendant in
prison, the expenses shall be paid out of the state treasury on the
certificate of the governor and warrant of the auditor, and in all other cases
they shall be paid out of the treasury of the county where the crime is
alleged to have been committed.  The expenses shall be the fees paid to the
officers of the state on whose governor the requisition is made.
(2)  Any person who is returned to the state under this chapter, and who is
convicted of, or pleads guilty or no contest to, the criminal charge or to a
lesser criminal charge may, under Sections 76-3-201, 77-27-5, and 77-27-6, be
required to make restitution to the appropriate governmental entities for the
costs of his extradition.
